Indiana, session 2026, SB188.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 14-15-14-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.35-2024,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The owner of a pier or public access site on
Lake Michigan shall install public rescue equipment on the pier or
public access site. The public rescue equipment installed on a pier or
public access site under this subsection:
(1) must include at least one (1) ring life buoy; and
(2) may include other types of public rescue equipment.
(b) The owner of a pier or public access site on Lake Michigan:
(1) shall oversee the installation and maintenance of the public
rescue equipment required by this section; and
(2) if the owner is the state of Indiana or a unit of local
government, shall also provide public education concerning the
public rescue equipment installed on the pier or public access site.
(c) A municipality that:
(1) is the owner of a pier or public access site on Lake
Michigan; and
2026 IN 188—LS 6524/DI 87


(2) fails to comply with the requirements of this chapter;
is subject to IC 36-9-11-7.5 or IC 36-10-5-6.
SECTION 2. IC 36-9-11-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.127-2017,
SECTION 294, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Except as provided in
section 7.5 of this chapter, in connection with the operation of any
parking facility, the municipal works board may fix the rates and
charges to be collected for the parking of vehicles, or for any other use
of the facility, and adopt rules governing the use and operation of the
facility so as to promote the maximum use of the facility by the public
in a safe, orderly, and efficient manner. In a city, however, these rates,
charges, and rules do not become effective until they are approved by
ordinance or resolution of the legislative body.
(b) All rates and charges for parking and other services must be
reasonable and designed to bring in revenues sufficient to cover the
cost of providing and operating necessary parking facilities.
(c) A person handling monies of one (1) or more parking facilities
must be properly bonded to insure a faithful accounting for the money
coming into the person's hands.
SECTION 3. IC 36-9-11-7.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 7.5. (a) As used in this section, "parking fee" means
a fee charged by a municipality to park a vehicle at a parking lot.
(b) As used in this section, "parking lot" means a municipally
owned parking lot that is located on the municipality's park beach
property on the Lake Michigan shore.
(c) A municipality may not charge a parking fee unless:
(1) a qualified lifeguard is on duty at the municipal park
beach at all times during the hours the municipal park beach
is open for swimming; and
(2) public rescue equipment is installed on any pier or public
access site of the municipality as required by IC 14-15-14.
(d) A municipality is not subject to subsection (c) while any
notes, bonds, leases, or other obligations are outstanding that the
municipality:
(1) issued, incurred, or entered into before July 1, 2026; and
(2) pays or pledged to pay from parking fee revenue.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter the terms of any
agreements made with the holders of any outstanding notes, bonds,
leases, or other obligations of the issuing municipality or to
authorize the issuing municipality to alter the terms of any
agreements, or to impair or to authorize the issuing municipality
2026 IN 188—LS 6524/DI 87


to impair the rights and remedies of any creditors of the issuing
municipality.
(e) Notwithstanding any other statute, a municipality may not
pledge or use parking fee revenue to pay or repay notes, bonds,
leases, or other obligations issued, incurred, or entered into after
June 30, 2026.
SECTION 4. IC 36-9-11-20 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 20. (a) This subsection
applies only to cities. Except as provided in section 7.5 of this
chapter, all or part of the gross revenues, or of the net revenues
remaining after the payment of the cost of operation, maintenance, and
repair, may be pledged to the payment of the principal of and interest
on the revenue bonds and the accumulation and maintenance of the
reserve for the bonds, in the manner and to the extent provided in the
ordinance or ordinances authorizing the issuance of the revenue bonds.
The ordinance or ordinances authorizing the issuance of revenue bonds
also may provide for a pledge of all or a designated part of the gross or
net revenues derived from:
(1) other parking facilities;
(2) onstreet parking meters;
(3) parking mechanisms;
(4) parking and traffic violation fines and fees;
(5) lease rentals in connection with any parking facilities, private
pledges, and contributions; and
(6) any federal and state grants and distributions not dedicated or
restricted by law to other purposes;
to the payment of principal of and interest on revenue bonds issued or
to be issued under this chapter, and to the accumulation and
maintenance of the reserve for the bonds. The extent and the manner
of making the pledge may be provided in the ordinance or ordinances
authorizing the issuance of bonds.
(b) This subsection applies only to towns. An ordinance authorizing
the issuance of revenue bonds for parking facilities may provide for a
pledge of all or a designated part of the unobligated net revenues
derived from other parking facilities, parking meters, or parking
mechanisms, to the extent required to maintain the parking sinking
fund established under section 19 of this chapter at the minimum level.
SECTION 5. IC 36-10-5-6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) This section applies only to a municipality that
has a municipal park beach on the Lake Michigan shore.
(b) As used in this section, "parking fee" means a fee charged by
2026 IN 188—LS 6524/DI 87


a municipality to park a vehicle at a parking lot.
(c) As used in this section, "parking lot" means a municipally
owned parking lot that is located on the municipal park beach
property.
(d) A municipality may not charge a parking fee unless:
(1) a qualified lifeguard is on duty at the municipal park
beach at all times during the hours the municipal park beach
is open for swimming; and
(2) public rescue equipment is installed on any pier or public
access site of the municipality as required by IC 14-15-14.
(e) A municipality is not subject to subsection (d) while any
notes, bonds, leases, or other obligations are outstanding that the
municipality:
(1) issued, incurred, or entered into before July 1, 2026; and
(2) pays or pledged to pay from parking fee revenue.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter the terms of any
agreements made with the holders of any outstanding notes, bonds,
leases, or other debt obligations of the issuing municipality or to
authorize the issuing municipality to alter the terms of any
agreements, or to impair or to authorize the issuing municipality
to impair the rights and remedies of any creditors of the issuing
municipality.
(f) Notwithstanding any other statute, a municipality may not
pledge or use parking fee revenue to pay or repay notes, bonds,
leases, or other obligations issued, incurred, or entered into after
June 30, 2026.
2026 IN 188—LS 6524/DI 87